zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 儲藏和收納 > 掛勾與收納架: 黏貼式掛鉤; 熨燙板掛鉤/架; 門後掛鉤; 傘架; 萬用掛勾
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Uskladnění a uspořádání > Skladovací háčky a regály: Lepicí háčky; Háčky a věšáky na žehlicí prkna; Háčky na dveře; Stojany na deštníky; Háčky na zavěšení věcí
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Shranjevanje in organizacija > Kljuke in stojala za shranjevanje: Lepilni kavlji; Kljuke in obešalniki za likalne deske; Kavlji za vrata; Stojala in obešalniki za dežnike; Obešalne kljuke
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Storage & Organization > Storage Hooks & Racks: Adhesive Hooks; Ironing Board Hooks & Racks; Over-the-Door Hooks; Umbrella Stands & Racks; Utility Hooks
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Odlaganje i organizacija > Kuke i stalci za pohranu: Ljepljive kuke; Kuke i stalci za dasku za glačanje; Kuke za vješanje preko vrata; Stalci i držači za kišobrane; Višenamjenske kuke
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Съхранение и организация > Куки и рафтове за съхранение: Лепящи куки; Куки и стойки за дъска за гладене; Куки за окачване над вратата; Стойки за чадъри и поставки; Помощни куки
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés > Tárolóhorgok és -állványok: Ragasztóhorgok; Vasalódeszka-horgok és -állványok; Ajtóra akasztható akasztók; Esernyőtartók és -állványok; Segédhorgok
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Organización y almacenamiento > Perchas y estanterías: Ganchos adhesivos; Perchas y colgadores para tablas de planchar; Ganchos para colgar sobre la puerta; Paragüeros; Ganchos para uso general
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Αποθήκευση & οργάνωση > Γάντζοι & ράφια αποθήκευσης: Αυτοκόλλητοι γάντζοι; Γάντζοι & ράφια σιδερώστρας; Γάντζοι πόρτας; Βάσεις & ράφια ομπρελών; Γάντζοι πολλαπλών χρήσεων
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Aufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme > Aufbewahrungshaken & Regale: Klebehaken; Bügelbrettaufhänger und -ablagen; Türhaken; Schirmständer & - halter; Mehrzweckhaken
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 储物/收纳 > 挂钩和置物架: 粘钩; 熨衣板挂钩/挂架; 门后挂钩; 伞架; 家用挂钩
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > การจัดเก็บและการจัดระเบียบ > ตะขอและชั้นเก็บของ: ตะขอแบบมีกาวในตัว; ชั้นและตะขอของที่รองรีด; ตะขอแขวนประตู; ที่ตั้งและราวสำหรับร่ม; ตะขอเกี่ยวของ
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Rangement et organisation > Crochets et patères: Crochets adhésifs; Crochets et stands pour tables à repasser; Crochets à suspendre aux portes; Porte-parapluies; Crochets utilitaires
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Lagring og organisering > Lagringskroker og -stativer: Selvklebende kroker; Strykebrettkroker og -stativer; Over-døren kroker; Paraplystativer og -holdere; Verktøykroker
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Хранение вещей > Крючки, полки и стойки для хранения: Клейкие крючки; Крючки и полки для гладильных досок; Крючки, которые вешаются на дверь; Подставки и стойки для зонтов; Хозяйственные крючки
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 収納 > 収納用フック・ラック: 粘着フック; アイロン台フック/ラック; ドア掛けフック; 傘立て; 多目的フック
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Armazenamento e organização > Ganchos e prateleiras para armazenamento: Ganchos adesivos; Ganchos e prateleiras para tábua de engomar; Ganchos para pendurar na porta; Porta guarda-chuvas; Ganchos diversos
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Đồ chứa và dụng cụ sắp xếp đồ > Móc và giá đựng đồ: Móc dán; Móc treo và giá đặt cầu là; Móc treo cửa; Giá và kệ để ô; Móc treo đa năng
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Przechowywanie i utrzymanie porządku > Haczyki i stojaki do przechowywania: Haczyki samoprzylepne; Haki i stojaki na deskę do prasowania; Haczyki na drzwi; Stojaki na parasolki; Haczyki do zastosowań ogólnych
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Skladovanie a organizácia > Úložné háky a stojany: Lepiace háčiky; Háky a stojany na žehliace dosky; Háčiky na dvere; Stojany a držiaky na dáždniky; Univerzálne háčiky
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Opbevaring og organisering > Opbevaringskroge og -stativer: Selvklæbende kroge; Kroge og holdere til strygebrætter; Kroge til at hænge over døren; Paraplyholdere og -stativer; Redskabskroge
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Depozitare și organizare > Cârlige și suporturi de depozitare: Cârlige adezive; Cârlige și suporturi pentru masa de călcat; Cârlige agățătoare pentru ușă; Stative și suporturi pentru umbrele; Cârlige utilitare
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Varasto ja säilytys > Säilytyskoukut ja -telineet: Itseliimautuvat koukut; Silityslaidan koukut ja telineet; Oven yli ripustettavat koukut; Silityslautatelineet; Varastokoukut
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Opruimen en organiseren > Opberghaken en -rekken: Zelfklevende haken; Haken en rekken voor strijkplanken; Haken voor over de deur; Standaards en rekken voor paraplu's; Gereedschapshaken
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Förvaring och organisation > Förvaringskrokar och hyllor: Självhäftande krokar; Krokar och stativ för strykbräda; Dörrkrokar; Paraplyställ och hyllor; Krokar
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Immagazzinamento e organizzazione > Ganci e portaabiti: Ganci adesivi; Ganci e rastrelliere per tavole da stiro; Ganci sopra la porta; Portaombrelli e supporti per ombrelli; Ganci
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 수납/정리용품 > 보관용 걸이/선반: 접착식 훅; 다리미판 걸이/선반; 문걸이형 훅; 우산꽂이; 다용도 걸이
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Armazenamento e organização > Cabides e prateleiras de armazenamento: Ganchos adesivos; Ganchos e suportes para tábua de passar; Ganchos para porta; Suportes e prateleiras para guarda-chuva; Ganchos utilitários
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Sandėliavimas ir tvarkymas > Sandėliavimo kabliukai ir lentynos: Lipnūs kabliukai; Lyginimo lentų kabliukai ir lentynos; Kabliukai virš durų; Skėčių stovai ir lentynos; Daiktų kabliukai
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Saklama ve Düzenleme > Saklama Amaçlı Kanca ve Raflar: Yapışkanlı Kancalar; Ütü Masası Kancaları ve Askıları; Kapı Üstü Askılar; Şemsiye Stant ve Rafları; Çok Amaçlı Kancalar